District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.20

Judicial and administrative review of actions of board.

Any person aggrieved by a final decision of a board or the Mayor may appeal the decision to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals pursuant to § 2-510.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 520, 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., § 2-3305.20.